California statutes. Education Code
(c) In any case in which (1) the annual benefit of the member or the member’s beneficiaries for the calendar year otherwise payable under the terms of this part, as measured under the provisions of Section 415(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 415(b)(2)) and adjusted to exclude the portion of the annual benefit attributable to employee contributions that are not “picked up” under Section 414(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 414(h)(2)) or attributable to rollover contributions described in Section 415(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, exceeds (2) the limitation on the dollar amount of an annual benefit applicable for the calendar year under Section 415(b)(1)(A) or subdivision (e) as applicable to a governmental plan, as defined in Section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 414(d)), the amount of the portion of the annual benefit shall be paid to the member or the member’s beneficiaries under the replacement benefit program in the manner described in subdivision (d). In no event shall the portion of the annual benefit from the replacement benefits program be payable from the assets of the Teachers’ Retirement Fund. In no event shall the replacement benefits program provide to the member or the member’s beneficiaries, directly or indirectly, any election to defer compensation.

(d) Any portion of the annual benefit of a member or the member’s beneficiaries for the year described in subdivision (c) shall be payable, at the same time and in the same form as the remainder of the annual benefit and subject to the terms and conditions of this part except as otherwise provided under this section, from the proceeds of the employer contributions due under Section 22950, and, notwithstanding Section 22956, prior to the deposit of those employer contributions in the State Treasury to the Teachers’ Retirement Fund. Upon receipt of the warrants for the employer contributions as described in Section 23001, the board shall retain and place in the Teachers’ Replacement Benefits Program Fund only the amounts of employer contributions as are necessary for the exclusive purpose of paying currently the monthly installment next due of the portion of the annual benefit payable from the replacement benefits program to the member or the member’s beneficiaries as well as any administrative expenses associated with the replacement benefits program. Amounts shall not be accumulated in the Teachers’ Replacement Benefits Program Fund for the payment of future benefits, and a member or the member’s beneficiaries who are to receive the portion of his or her annual benefit under the replacement benefits program shall have no entitlement to amounts in the Teachers’ Replacement Benefits Program Fund until distributed to him or her as a benefit.

(e) The portion of the annual benefit payable under the replacement benefits program shall be subject to withholding for any applicable income or employment taxes.

(f) The administrative expenses of the replacement benefits program may include the employer portion of the Medicare payroll tax on the replacement benefits program payments of a retired member who is required to contribute to Medicare. The employee portion of the Medicare payroll tax on the replacement benefits program payments to retired members in this program who are required to contribute to Medicare shall be withheld from the replacement benefits program payments to the retired member.

(g) The board may by plan amendment amend the terms of the replacement benefits program established under this section as appropriate to comply with applicable federal or state law.

(h) All references to sections of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 are to those sections as are amended from time to time or their successor sections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 803, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

24270.

In the case of any member or member’s beneficiaries whose annual benefit otherwise payable under the provisions of this part has been reduced for any year by reason of application of the 100 percent of compensation limitation on benefits under Section 415(b)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 415(b)(1)(B)) the reduced annual benefit shall be restored to its full amount otherwise payable for that year. In the case of restorations in respect of annual benefits that were paid prior to January 1, 2000, the additional benefit amount shall be paid by the system to the member or the member’s beneficiaries on or before April 1, 2000.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 465, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

24275.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, the benefits payable to any person shall be subject to the limitations of Section 415 (other than Section 415(b)(1)(B)) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 415) as applicable to a governmental plan as those sections are amended from time to time or their successor sections.

(b) This section and Section 24270 shall be applicable to benefits payable in all plan years beginning before, on, or after enactment of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 465, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 28. Options [24300. - 24348.]

24300.

(a) A member may, upon application for retirement, elect an option pursuant to this part that would provide an actuarially modified retirement allowance payable throughout the life of the member and the member’s option beneficiary or beneficiaries, as follows:

(1) Option 2.The modified retirement allowance shall be paid to the retired member. Upon the retired member’s death, an allowance equal to the modified amount that the retired member was receiving shall be paid to the option beneficiary.

(2) Option 3.The modified retirement allowance shall be paid to the retired member. Upon the retired member’s death, an
 allowance equal to one-half of the modified amount that the retired member was receiving shall be paid to the option beneficiary.

(3) Option 4.The modified retirement allowance shall be paid to the retired member as long as both the retired member and the option beneficiary are living. Upon the death of either the retired member or the option beneficiary, an allowance equal to two-thirds of the modified amount that the retired member was receiving shall be paid to the surviving retired member or the surviving option beneficiary.

(4) Option 5.The modified retirement allowance shall be paid to the retired member as long as both the retired member and the option beneficiary are living. Upon the death of either the retired member or the option beneficiary, an allowance equal to one-half of the modified amount that the retired member was
 receiving shall be paid to the surviving retired member or surviving option beneficiary.

(5) Option 6.The modified retirement allowance shall be paid to the retired member and upon the retired member’s death, an allowance equal to the modified amount that the retired member was receiving shall be paid to the option beneficiary.

(6) Option 7.The modified retirement allowance shall be paid to the retired member and upon the retired member’s death, an allowance equal to one-half of the modified amount the retired member was receiving shall be paid to the option beneficiary.

(7) Option 8.(A) A member may designate multiple option beneficiaries. The member who has designated more than one option beneficiary shall elect an option
 that the member is authorized to elect subject to subdivision (e) for each beneficiary designated that would provide an actuarially modified retirement allowance payable throughout the lives of the member and the member’s option beneficiaries upon the member’s death.

(B) The modified retirement allowance shall be paid to the retired member as long as the retired member and at least one of the option beneficiaries are living. Upon the retired member’s death, an allowance shall be paid to each surviving option beneficiary in accordance with the option elected respective to that beneficiary. The member shall determine the percentage of the unmodified allowance that will be modified by the election of Option 2, Option 3, Option 4, Option 5, Option 6, or Option 7 within this option, the aggregate of which shall equal 100 percent of the member’s unmodified allowance. The election of this option is subject to approval by the board.

(C) A member who is a party to an action for legal separation or dissolution of marriage and who is required by court order to designate a spouse or former spouse as an option beneficiary may designate his or her spouse or former spouse as a sole option beneficiary under subparagraphs (A) and (B). The member shall specify the option elected for the spouse or former spouse and the percentage of his or her unmodified allowance to be modified by the option, consistent with the court order. The percentage of the member’s unmodified allowance that is not modified by the option shall remain an unmodified allowance payable to the member. The aggregate of the percentages specified for the option beneficiary and the member’s remaining unmodified allowance, if any, shall equal 100 percent.

(b) For purposes of this section, the member shall designate an option beneficiary on a properly executed
 retirement application. Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, the option shall become effective on the member’s benefit effective date.

(c) A member may revoke or change an election of an option at any time prior to the effective date of the member’s retirement under this part. A revocation or change of an option may not be made in derogation of a spouse’s or former spouse’s community property rights as specified in a court order.

(d) (1) A member may change the beneficiary designated pursuant to this section without penalty by designating a trust as beneficiary if all of the following requirements are met:

(A) The trust conforms to the definition of trust in Section 22149.

(B) The beneficiary of the trust is the same
 person as the previously named option beneficiary.

(C) The member files an application and any required documents in a form prescribed by the system.

(2) If a trust is determined to be invalid or terminates after the system commences payment to the trust, beginning on the effective date of termination of the trust, the benefit shall be paid to, and all associated rights and responsibilities shall accrue to, the beneficiary of the trust so long as that beneficiary is eligible to receive a benefit pursuant to this section.

(e) On or before July 1, 2004, the board shall evaluate the existing options and annuities provided pursuant to this section, Chapter 38 (commencing with Section 25000) of this part, and Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000) and adopt, as a plan amendment, any appropriate changes to the options and
 annuities based on the needs of members, participants, and their beneficiaries, including, but not limited to, providing economic security for beneficiaries and reducing complexity in the election of options and annuities by members and participants. The changes to the options and annuities may have no net actuarial impact on the retirement fund, and the board may establish any eligibility criteria it deems necessary to prevent an adverse actuarial impact to the fund. The board shall designate the effective date of the plan amendment, which shall be at least 18 months after the amendment is adopted by the board, and notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the options and annuities available to members and participants eligible to retire pursuant to this part and Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000), after the effective date of the plan amendment made pursuant to this subdivision, shall reflect the changes adopted as a plan amendment pursuant to this subdivision.

(f) Any member or participant who retired and elected an option or a joint and survivor annuity, or who filed a preretirement election of an option prior to the effective date of the plan amendment made pursuant to subdivision (d), may elect to change to a different option or joint and survivor annuity, as modified by the board as a plan amendment pursuant to subdivision (d), if the member or participant meets all the criteria established by the board to prevent a change in an option or joint and survivor annuity from having an adverse actuarial impact on the retirement fund, including, but not limited to, the effective date of a new designation or limitations on any changes if a member or participant, as the case may be, or beneficiary, or both, is currently not living or afflicted with a known terminal illness. The member or participant shall designate the change during the six-month period that begins with the effective date of the plan
 amendment, on a form prescribed by the system. Any member changing an option election pursuant to this subdivision is not subject to the allowance reduction prescribed in Section 24309 or 24310 as a result of the election. If a member or participant elects to change his or her option or joint and survivor annuity under this subdivision, the member or participant shall retain the same option beneficiary or beneficiaries as named in the prior designation.

(g) The Legislature reserves the right to modify this section prior to the effective date of the plan amendment made pursuant to subdivision (d) to prevent any actuarial impact to the fund.

(h) Except as described in subdivision (e) of Section 24300.1, on or after January 1, 2007, a member may not make a new election for an option or joint and survivor annuity described in subdivision (a).

(i) Any member with a retirement effective on or after January 1, 2007, shall elect an option from the options described in Section 24300.1. Any member making a new option election under the provisions of Section 24320, 24321, 24322, or 24323 shall elect an option from the options described in Section 24300.1 if the effective date of the new option election is on or after January 1, 2007.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 559, Sec. 6.   (AB 1875)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

24300.1.

(a) A member may, upon application for retirement, elect an option pursuant to this part that would provide an actuarially modified retirement allowance payable throughout the life of the member and the member’s option beneficiary or beneficiaries, as follows:

(1) One hundred percent beneficiary option. The modified retirement allowance shall be paid to the retired member and upon the member’s death, 100 percent of the modified allowance shall continue to be paid to the option beneficiary.

(2) Seventy-five percent beneficiary option. The modified retirement allowance shall be paid to the retired member and upon the member’s death, 75 percent of the modified
 allowance shall continue to be paid to the option beneficiary. Pursuant to Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code, unless the option beneficiary is the member’s spouse or former spouse who has been awarded a community property interest in the benefits of the member under this part, the member may not designate an option beneficiary under this option who is more than exactly 19 years younger than the member.

(3) Fifty percent beneficiary option. The modified retirement allowance shall be paid to the retired member and upon the member’s death, 50 percent of the modified allowance shall continue to be paid to the option beneficiary.

(4) Compound option. The member may designate multiple option beneficiaries or one or multiple option beneficiaries with a designated percentage to remain unmodified. The member shall elect an option as described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) for
 each designated option beneficiary that would provide an actuarially modified retirement allowance payable throughout the lives of the retired member and the member’s option beneficiary or beneficiaries upon the member’s death.

(A) The modified retirement allowance shall be paid to the member as long as the member and at least one option beneficiary is living. Upon the member’s death, an allowance shall be paid to each surviving option beneficiary in accordance with the option elected respective to that option beneficiary.

(B) The member shall specify the percent of the unmodified allowance that will be modified by the election of each option described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of this subdivision. The percent of the unmodified allowance that is not modified by an option, if any, shall be payable to the member. The sum of the percentages specified for the option beneficiary or
 beneficiaries and the member’s remaining unmodified allowance, if any, shall equal 100 percent.

(C) The member’s election of the compound option is subject to all of the following:

(i) Pursuant to Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code, unless the option beneficiary is the member’s spouse or former spouse who has been awarded a community property interest in the member’s benefits under this part, the member may not designate an option beneficiary under the 100 percent beneficiary option within this compound option who is more than exactly 10 years younger than the member.

(ii) Pursuant to Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code, unless the option beneficiary is the member’s spouse or former spouse who has been awarded a community property interest in the member’s benefits under this part, the member
 may not designate an option beneficiary under the 75 percent beneficiary option within this compound option who is more than exactly 19 years younger than the member.

(b) For purposes of this section, the member shall designate an option beneficiary on a properly executed retirement application. Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, the option shall become effective on the member’s benefit effective date.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), a member may revoke or change an election of an option no later than 30 days from the date the member’s initial benefit payment for the member’s most recent retirement under the Defined Benefit Program is paid by the system. A revocation of an option may not be made in derogation of a spouse’s or a former spouse’s community property rights as specified in a court order.

(d) (1) A member may change the beneficiary designated pursuant to this section without penalty by designating a trust as beneficiary if all of the following requirements are met:

(A) The trust conforms to the definition of trust in Section 22149.

(B) The beneficiary of the trust is the same person as the previously named option beneficiary.

(C) The member files an application and any required documents in a form prescribed by the system.

(2) If a trust is determined to be invalid or terminates after the system commences payment to the trust, beginning on the effective date of termination of the trust, the benefit shall be paid to, and all associated rights and responsibilities shall accrue to, the beneficiary of the
 trust so long as that beneficiary is eligible to receive a benefit pursuant to this section.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 297 or 299.2 of the Family Code, a spouse described in paragraphs (2) and (4) of subdivision (a) does not include the domestic partner of the member, pursuant to Section 7 of Title 1 of the United States Code.

(f) If there is a determination of community property rights as described in Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 22650) of this part on or before December 31, 2006, the member may elect the option that is required by the judgment or court order. Nothing in this part shall permit the member to change the option to the detriment of the community property interest of the nonmember spouse.

(g) The board may evaluate the existing options and annuities provided pursuant to this section, Chapter 38
 (commencing with Section 25000) of this part, and Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000) and adopt, as a plan amendment, any appropriate changes to the options and annuities based on the needs of the members, participants, and their beneficiaries, including, but not limited to, providing economic security for beneficiaries and reducing the complexity of the options and annuities. The changes to the options and annuities may have no net actuarial impact on the retirement fund and the board may establish any eligibility criteria the board deems necessary to prevent an adverse actuarial impact to the fund. The board shall designate the effective date of the plan amendment, which shall be at least 18 months after the amendment is adopted by the board, and notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the options and annuities available to members and participants eligible to retire pursuant to this part and Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000), after the effective date of the plan amendment made
 pursuant to this subdivision, shall reflect the changes adopted as a plan amendment to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 559, Sec. 7.   (AB 1875)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

24307.

(a) A member who qualifies to apply for retirement under Section 24201 or 24203 may make a preretirement election of an option, as provided in Section 24300.1 without right of revocation or change after the benefit effective date, except as provided in this part. The preretirement election of an option shall become effective as of the date of the member’s signature on a properly executed form prescribed by the system, subject to the following requirements:

(1) The form includes the signature of the member’s spouse or registered domestic partner, if applicable, and the signature is dated.

(2) The date the form is received at the system’s headquarters office is
 within 30 days after the date of the member’s signature and, if applicable, the spouse’s or registered domestic partner’s signature.

(b) A member who makes a preretirement election of an Option 2, Option 3, Option 4, Option 5, Option 6, or Option 7 pursuant to Section 24300, or an election as described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of Section 24300.1 may subsequently make a preretirement election of the compound option described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1. The member may retain the same option and the same option beneficiary as named in the prior preretirement election for a designated percentage within the compound option.

(c) Upon the member’s death prior to the benefit effective date, the beneficiary who was designated under the option elected and who survives shall receive an allowance calculated under the option, under the assumption that the
 member retired for service pursuant to Chapter 27 (commencing with Section 24201) on the date of death. The payment of the allowance to the option beneficiary shall be in lieu of the family allowance provided in Section 23804, the payment provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 23802, the survivor benefit allowance provided in Section 23854, and the payment provided in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 23852, except that if the beneficiary dies before all of the member’s accumulated retirement contributions are paid, the balance, if any, shall be paid to the estate of the person last receiving or entitled to receive the allowance. The accumulated annuity deposit contributions and the death payment provided in Sections 23801 and 23851 shall be paid to the beneficiary in a lump sum.

(d) If the member subsequently retires for service, and the elected option has not been canceled pursuant to Section 24309, a modified service
 retirement allowance computed under Section 24300 or 24300.1 and the option elected shall be paid.

(e) The amount of the service retirement allowance prior to applying the option factor shall be calculated as of the earlier of the member’s age at death before retirement or age on the last day of the month in which the member requested service retirement be effective. The modification of the service retirement allowance by the option elected shall be based on the ages of the member and the beneficiary designated under the option, as of the date the election was signed.

(f) A member who terminates the service retirement allowance pursuant to Section 24208 shall not be eligible to file a preretirement election of an option until one calendar year elapses from the date the allowance is terminated. If the member retires again within one calendar year of the termination of their benefit
 pursuant to Section 24208, the retired member shall keep, upon subsequent retirement, the option and beneficiary or the unmodified election in place upon the date the termination of the benefits became effective.

(1) If the member’s option beneficiary or beneficiaries predecease the member within one calendar year of the termination of benefits and before the member has retired again, upon notification to the system, the system shall cancel the option and beneficiary from that portion of the benefit with reduction pursuant to Section 24309. The member shall not elect a new option or beneficiary pursuant to Section 24310 until one calendar year from the termination effective date has elapsed.

(2) If a final decree of dissolution of marriage or a judgment of nullity has been entered or an order of separate maintenance has been made within one calendar year of the termination of
 benefits and the member has not retired again, upon notification to the system, the system shall cancel or change the option election in accordance with the court order with reduction pursuant to Section 24309. Any additional changes shall not be made until one calendar year from the termination effective date has elapsed.

(g) (1) A member may change the beneficiary designated pursuant to this section without penalty by designating a trust as beneficiary if all of the following requirements are met:

(A) The trust conforms to the definition of trust in Section 22149.

(B) The beneficiary of the trust is the same person as the previously named option beneficiary.

(C) The member files an application and any required documents in a form
 prescribed by the system.

(2) If a trust is determined to be invalid or terminates after the system commences payment to the trust, beginning on the effective date of termination of the trust, the benefit shall be paid to, and all associated rights and responsibilities shall accrue to, the beneficiary of the trust so long as that beneficiary is eligible to receive a benefit pursuant to this section.

(h) The system shall inform members who are qualified to make a preretirement election of an option, through the annual statements of account, that the election of an option can be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 559, Sec. 8.   (AB 1875)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

24307.5.

Upon retirement for service, the member who filed a preretirement election of an option under Section 24307 shall have his or her allowance modified by the greater of the option factor as of the effective date of the preretirement election, or the option factor at the time the member’s retirement became effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 349, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

24309.

(a) A member may change or cancel the election of an option made pursuant to Section 24307. The change or cancellation shall be on a properly executed form provided by the system and received at the system’s headquarters office within 30 days after the date of the member’s signature and, if applicable, the spouse’s signature, and no later than 30 days from the date the member’s initial benefit payment for the member’s most recent retirement under the Defined Benefit Program is paid by the system. The change or cancellation shall become effective as of the date of the member’s signature or the day prior to the member’s benefit effective date, whichever is earlier. Except as provided in subdivision (g) of Section 24307, both of the following
 shall apply:

(1) Any change to an election of an option shall be made according to Section 24307 and shall be considered a new preretirement election of an option.

(2) Regardless of how the member elects to receive the member’s service retirement allowance, a change made to an election of an option or a cancellation of an option shall result in the reduction of that allowance by an amount determined by the board to be the actuarial equivalent of the coverage the member received as a result of the preretirement election and that does not result in any adverse funding to the plan.

(b) If the option beneficiary designated in the preretirement election of an option pursuant to Section 24307 dies prior to the member’s
 retirement, the preretirement election shall be canceled as of the day following the date of death and the member’s subsequent retirement allowance under this part shall be subject to the allowance reduction prescribed in this section.

(c) If the option elected pursuant to Section 24307 is “Option 8” as described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300 or the compound option as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1, a member may cancel the designation of an option beneficiary. If the member cancels the designation of the option beneficiary or the option beneficiary predeceases the member prior to the member’s retirement, the member may elect to receive that portion of the retirement allowance without modification for the option or elect one or multiple new or existing option beneficiaries as described
 in Section 24307. Any change or cancellation of the designation of the option beneficiary under this subdivision shall result in the allowance reduction prescribed in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 96, Sec. 21.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

24310.

If an election of an option is canceled under Section 24309, the member may again elect an option under Section 24307. If an election of an option is changed or canceled during any year, the reduction for that year shall be that for the option to which the greater reduction under Section 24309 as it read on December 31, 1995, is applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 59.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

24311.

Upon termination of a service retirement allowance pursuant to Section 24208, any option elected pursuant to Section 24300 or 24300.1 and in effect at the time of reinstatement shall be considered to be a preretirement election of an option elected as of the effective date of the most recent retirement and shall be subject to the same provisions as an option elected under Section 24307.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 24302 by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 46.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

24312.

Termination of the service retirement allowance pursuant to Section 24208 shall not cancel an option elected under the provisions of Section 24307. The effective date of the option shall remain the original election date pursuant to Section 24307.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 24303 by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 47.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

24320.

(a) An option elected under Section 24300 or 24300.1 may be canceled by a retired member if the option beneficiary is not the retired member’s spouse or former spouse. A retired member may cancel the option before or after issuance of the first retirement allowance payment and shall designate his or her spouse as the new option beneficiary and the same or a different joint and survivor option described in Section 24300.1.

(b) The retired member shall notify the board, in writing on a properly executed form provided by the system, of the designation of the new option beneficiary. Notification shall include a certified copy of the marriage certificate
 and a properly executed form for the change.

(c) The effective date of the new election shall be six months following the date notification is received by the board, provided both the retired member and the new designated option beneficiary are then living. If the effective date of the new option election is on or after January 1, 2007, at the time of the new election the retired member shall elect an option from the options described in Section 24300.1. If, before the new election becomes effective, the member terminates his or her benefit pursuant to Section 24208 or the retired member or the new option beneficiary dies, the new election is void and the previous election remains in effect.

(d) The election of the option and designation of the option beneficiaries under this
 section and Section 24300.1 shall be subject to an actuarial modification of the retirement allowance. In no event may a retired member elect a joint and survivor option that would result in any additional liability to the fund. A retired member may not elect the compound option described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1. Modification of the retirement allowance because of the new option beneficiary and the new option shall be based on the ages of the retired member and the new option beneficiary as of the effective date of the new election.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 24305.5 by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 52.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

24321.

(a) Any retired member who was unmarried and not in a registered domestic partnership on the benefit effective date who did not elect an option pursuant to Section 24300, 24300.1, or 24307, and who thereafter marries or registers in a domestic partnership, may, after the effective date of the member’s retirement under this part, elect an option described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1, naming his or her new spouse or registered domestic partner as the option beneficiary, subject to all of the following:

(1) The retired member shall have been married or registered in a domestic partnership for at least one year
 prior to making the election of the option.

(2) The retired member shall notify the board, in writing on a properly executed form provided by the system, of the election of the option and the designation of the member’s new spouse or registered domestic partner as the option beneficiary. That notice shall include a certified copy of the marriage certificate or the certificate of registration of domestic partnership.

(3) The election of an option under this section is subject to approval by the board. A retired member may not elect a joint and survivor option that would result in any additional liability to the retirement fund. A retired member may not elect the compound option described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1.

(4) The election shall be effective six months after the date the notification is received by the board, provided that both the retired member and the retired member’s designated spouse or registered domestic partner are then living. If the effective date of the new option election is on or after January 1, 2007, at the time of the new election the retired member shall elect an option from the options described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1. If, before the new election becomes effective, the member terminates his or her benefit pursuant to Section 24208 or the retired member or the new option beneficiary dies, the new election is void and the unmodified election remains in effect.

(b) The election of the option and designation of the option beneficiary
 under this section shall result in an actuarial modification of the member’s retirement allowance that shall be payable through the life of the member and the member’s new spouse or registered domestic partner. Modification of the member’s retirement allowance pursuant to this section shall be based on the ages of the retired member and the retired member’s new spouse or registered domestic partner as of the effective date of the election.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 24300.6 by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 44.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

24322.

(a) An option elected under Section 24300, 24300.1, or 24307 may be canceled by a retired member if the option beneficiary is the retired member’s spouse or former spouse and a final decree of dissolution of marriage or a judgment of nullity has been entered or an order of separate maintenance has been made on or after January 1, 1978, by a court of competent jurisdiction. A retired member may cancel the option before or after issuance of the first retirement allowance payment.

(b) The retired member shall notify the board, in writing on a properly executed form provided by the system, of cancellation of the option. Notification shall not be earlier than the effective date of the decree, judgment, or order and shall include a certified copy of the final decree
 of dissolution, or judgment of nullity, or an order of separate maintenance, and any property settlement agreement.

(c) Upon notification to the board, the retired member may elect: (1) to receive the unmodified retirement allowance from the date of receipt of the notification; or (2) a new joint and survivor option under Section 24300.1 and may designate one or multiple new option beneficiaries. Modification of the retirement allowance because of the newly elected option or newly designated beneficiary or beneficiaries shall be based on the ages of the retired member and the new option beneficiary or beneficiaries as of the effective date of the new option. The election of a new joint and survivor option or the designation of a new option beneficiary or beneficiaries shall be consistent with the final decree of dissolution, judgment of nullity, order of separate maintenance, or property settlement agreement, and shall not result in any
 additional liability to the Teachers’ Retirement Fund. The effective date of the change shall be the date notification is received by the board.

(d) (1) A retired member electing to receive an unmodified or modified retirement allowance pursuant to subdivision (c), who is not married or in a registered domestic partnership at the time of the election and who thereafter marries or registers in a domestic partnership, may later elect an option described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1, naming his or her new spouse or registered domestic partner as the option beneficiary, subject to all of the following:

(A) The retired member shall notify the board, in writing on a properly executed form provided by the system, of the election of the option and
 the designation of the member’s new spouse or registered domestic partner as the option beneficiary. That notice shall include a certified copy of the marriage certificate or the certificate of registration of domestic partnership.
